Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are  appropriated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the  following amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Judicial compensation............... $ 87,141,293
(2) Operations................................. $340,873,732
(3) Mandated payments .................. $ 16,606,161
(4) State court technology
systems ..................................... $ 3,432,622
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 30,968,960
(6) Third-party debt
collection................................... $ 15,312,377
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery  funds and
federal funds not described in this section,  collected or received by the Judicial Department
for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 16,339,627
(2) Mandated payments .................. $ 689,109
(3) State Court Facilities and
Security Account ...................... $ 6,716,018
(4) State Court Technology Fund ... $ 19,410,111
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,357,254 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds other  than those described in section 2 of this 2019
Act collected or received by the Judicial Department.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $320,442 for payment of expenses of the Oregon Law Commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5513 (SB 5513-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $51,710 for payment of expenses of the Council on Court Procedures.
SECTION 6. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $7,183,170 for the purpose  of providing conciliation and mediation
services in circuit courts.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute the moneys appropriated  un-
der this section to the counties of this state to fund  conciliation and mediation services in
circuit courts. The Chief Justice shall consult with  the presiding judges of the circuit courts
before making the distributions.
SECTION 7. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $7,183,170 for the purpose  of operating law libraries or providing
law library services.
(2) The  Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute the moneys appropriated un-
der this section to the counties of this state based on revenues received  from filing fees
collected during the 2017-2019 biennium in civil actions commenced in the circuit court for
the county.
SECTION 8.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $12,257,000 for  the purpose of funding the Legal Services Program
described in ORS 9.572.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute all moneys appropriated under
this section to the Oregon State Bar in eight quarterly installments of equal amount.
SECTION 9. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (1),  chapter 575, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for judicial compensation, is decreased by $950,000.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Judicial Department by section 1 (2), chapter 575, Oregon  Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for operations, is decreased by $800,000.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Judicial Department by section 16, chapter 650, Oregon  Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $600,000.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Judicial Department by section 141 (1), chapter 702, Oregon Laws 2017, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $500,000.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Judicial Department by section 1 (3), chapter 575, Oregon  Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for mandated payments, is increased by $950,000.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Judicial Department by section 1 (6), chapter 575, Oregon  Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for third-party debt collection, is increased by $1,900,000.
SECTION 10. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5513 (SB 5513-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5513 (SB 5513-A) Page 3